Hawaii statutes.
§572C-2 Findings. The legislature
acknowledges that there are many individuals who have significant personal,
emotional, and economic relationships with another individual yet are
prohibited by legal restrictions from marrying. For example, two individuals
who are related to one another, such as a widowed mother and her unmarried son.
Therefore, the legislature believes that certain rights and benefits presently
available only to married couples should be made available to couples comprised
of two individuals who are legally prohibited from marrying one another. [L
1997, c 383, pt of §1; am L Sp 2013 2d, c 1, §9]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next